tests/data/postgen.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="test"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    
    <pardef n="el">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el<b/></l>
          <r>l<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>l</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="le">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/></l>
          <r>se<b/>la<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>las<b/></l>
          <r>se<b/>las<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lo<b/></l>
          <r>se<b/>lo<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>los<b/></l>
          <r>se<b/>los<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">

     <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>de<b/></l>
          <r>de</r>
        </p>
        <par n="el"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>o<b/>ho</l>
          <r>u<b/>ho</r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>le<b/></l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="le"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>les<b/></l>
          <r>le<b/>pe<b/>test<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>les<b/>pes<b/></l>
          <r>les<b/>pes<b/>test<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    <!-- <e><p><l><a/>sss</l><r>ss</r></p></e> -->

  </section>

</dictionary>
